test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k37_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skógvur
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: skógv
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: skógvi
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: skós
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: skógvar
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: skógvar
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [skóm, skógvum]
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: skógva
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: skógvurin
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: skógvin
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [skónum, skógvinum]
    skógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: skósins
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: skógvarnir
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: skógvarnar
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [skónum, skógvunum]
    skógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: skógvanna
